Utah statutes.
26-18a-4.   Creation of Kurt Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Kurt Oscarson Children's Organ Transplant Account."  Private contributions received under this section and Section 59-10-1308 shall be deposited into the restricted account to be used only for the programs and purposes described in Section 26-18a-3.

(2)  Money shall be appropriated from the restricted account to the committee in accordance with Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.

(3)  In addition to funds received under Section 59-10-1308, the committee may accept transfers, grants, gifts, bequests, or any money made available from any source to implement this chapter.

